North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 13. Law Enforcement.

§ 160A-281.
Policemen appointed.

A city is authorized to appoint a chief of police and to employ other police officers who may reside outside the corporate limits of the city unless the council provides otherwise.

History.

R.C., c. 111, s. 16; Code, c. 3803; Rev., s. 2926; C.S., s. 2641; 1969, c. 23, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 45.

Cross References.

As to disposition of retired service animals, see

G.S. 20-187.4

.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Municipal Tort Liability for Negligent Failure to Provide Adequate Police Protection,” see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 697 (1984).

For article, “Discipline and Policing,” see 68 Duke L.J. 840 (2019).

§ 160A-282.
Auxiliary law-enforcement personnel; workers’ compensation benefits.

A city may by ordinance provide for the organization of an auxiliary police department made up of volunteer members.

A city, by enactment of an ordinance, may provide that, while undergoing official training and while performing duties on behalf of the city pursuant to orders or instructions of the chief of police of the city, auxiliary law-enforcement personnel shall be entitled to benefits under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act and to any fringe benefits for which such volunteer personnel qualify.

The board of commissioners of any county may provide that persons who are deputized by the sheriff of the county as special deputy sheriffs or persons who are serving as volunteer law-enforcement officers at the request of the sheriff and under his authority, while undergoing official training and while performing duties on behalf of the county pursuant to orders or instructions of the sheriff, shall be entitled to benefits under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act and to any fringe benefits for which such persons qualify.This subsection shall not apply to volunteer school safety resource officers as described in

G.S. 162-26

.

History.

1969, c. 206, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 1263, s. 1; 1979, c. 714, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1247, s. 28; 2013-360, s. 8.45(d).

Local Modification.

Columbus: 1973, c. 1263, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 8.45(d), effective December 1, 2013, added the second paragraph in subsection (c).

§ 160A-283.
Joint county and city auxiliary police.

The governing body of any city, town, or county is hereby authorized to create and establish a joint law-enforcement officers’ auxiliary force with one or more cities, towns, or counties. Each participating city, town, or county shall, by resolution or ordinance, establish the joint auxiliary police force. The resolution or ordinance shall specify whether the members of the joint auxiliary police force shall be volunteers or shall be paid. Members shall be appointed by the respective governmental units and shall take the oath required for regular police officers. The joint auxiliary force may be called into active service at any time by the mayor or chief of police of the participating town or city or the chairman of the board of commissioners or sheriff of a participating county. Members of the joint auxiliary force, while undergoing official training and while on active duty shall be members of the unit which called the auxiliary force into active duty and shall be entitled to all powers, privileges and immunities afforded by law to regularly employed law-enforcement officers of that unit including benefits under the Workers’ Compensation Act. Members of the joint auxiliary force shall not be considered as public officers within the meaning of the North Carolina Constitution. Such members shall be dressed in the uniform prescribed by such auxiliary force at any time such members or member exercises any of the duties or authority herein provided for.

History.

1971, c. 607; c. 896, s. 4; 1979, c. 714, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to authority of counties under this section, see also

G.S. 153A-212

.

§ 160A-284.
Oath of office; holding other offices.

Each person appointed or employed as chief of police, policeman, or auxiliary policeman shall take and subscribe before some person authorized by law to administer oaths the oath of office required by Article VI, Sec. 7, of the Constitution. The oath shall be filed with the city clerk.

The offices of policeman and chief of police are hereby declared to be offices that may be held concurrently with any other appointive office pursuant to Article VI, Sec. 9, of the Constitution. The offices of policeman and chief of police are hereby declared to be offices that may be held concurrently with any elective office, other than elective office in the municipality employing the policeman or chief of police, pursuant to Section 9 of Article VI of the Constitution.

The office of auxiliary policeman is hereby declared to be an office that may be held concurrently with any elective office or appointive office pursuant to Article VI, Sec. 9, of the Constitution.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; c. 896, s. 4; 1975, c. 664, s. 10; 2018-13, s. 4(a).

§ 160A-285.
Powers and duties of policemen.

As a peace officer, a policeman shall have within the corporate limits of the city all of the powers invested in law-enforcement officers by statute or common law. He shall also have power to serve all civil and criminal process that may be directed to him by any officer of the General Court of Justice and may enforce the ordinances and regulations of the city as the council may direct.

History.

Code, s. 3811; Rev., s. 2927; C.S., s. 2642; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; c. 896, s. 4.

§ 160A-286.
Extraterritorial jurisdiction of policemen.

In addition to their authority within the corporate limits, city policemen shall have all the powers invested in law-enforcement officers by statute or common law within one mile of the corporate limits of the city, and on all property owned by or leased to the city wherever located.

Any officer pursuing an offender outside the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of the city shall be entitled to all of the privileges, immunities, and benefits to which he would be entitled if acting within the city, including coverage under the workers’ compensation laws.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; c. 896, s. 4; 1973, c. 426, s. 46; c. 1286, s. 24; 1991, c. 636, s. 3.

Local Modification.

Gaston: 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 836, s. 2; Sampson: 1985, c. 292; city of Clinton: 1985, c. 292, s. 1; town of Pittsboro: 1983, c. 348.

§ 160A-287.
City lockups. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

A city shall have authority to establish, erect, repair, maintain and operate a lockup for the temporary detention of prisoners pending their transferal to the county or district jail or the State Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice.

History.

Code, ss. 704, 3117; 1901, c. 283; 1905, c. 526; Rev., s. 2916; 1907, c. 978; P.L. 1917, c. 223; C.S., s. 2623; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 58; 1927, c. 14; 1933, c. 69; 1949, c. 938; 1955, c. 77; 1959, c. 391; 1961, c. 308; 1967, c. 100, s. 2; c. 1122, s. 1; 1969, c. 944; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; c. 896, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 3(a).

§ 160A-287.
City lockups. [Effective January 1, 2023]

A city shall have authority to establish, erect, repair, maintain and operate a lockup for the temporary detention of prisoners pending their transferal to the county or district jail or the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

History.

Code, ss. 704, 3117; 1901, c. 283; 1905, c. 526; Rev., s. 2916; 1907, c. 978; P.L. 1917, c. 223; C.S., s. 2623; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 58; 1927, c. 14; 1933, c. 69; 1949, c. 938; 1955, c. 77; 1959, c. 391; 1961, c. 308; 1967, c. 100, s. 2; c. 1122, s. 1; 1969, c. 944; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; c. 896, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 3(a); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(qqqq).

§ 160A-288.
Cooperation between law enforcement agencies.

Unless specifically prohibited or limited by an ordinance officially adopted by the governing body of the city or county by which the person is employed, appointed, or elected to serve, the head of any law enforcement agency may temporarily provide assistance to another agency if so requested in writing by the head of the requesting agency. The assistance may comprise allowing officers of the agency to work temporarily with officers of the requesting agency (including in an undercover capacity) and lending equipment and supplies. While working with the requesting agency under the authority of this section, an officer shall have the same jurisdiction, powers, rights, privileges and immunities (including those relating to the defense of civil actions and payment of judgments) as the officers of the requesting agency in addition to those the officer normally possesses. While on duty with the requesting agency, the officer shall be subject to the lawful operational commands of the officer’s superior officers in the requesting agency, but the officer shall for personnel and administrative purposes, remain under the control of the officer’s own agency, including for purposes of pay. The officer shall furthermore be entitled to workers’ compensation and the same benefits when acting pursuant to this section to the same extent as though the officer were functioning within the normal scope of the officer’s duties.

As used in this section:

“Head” means any director or chief officer of a law enforcement agency including the chief of police of a local department, chief of police of county police department, and the sheriff of a county, or an officer of one of the above named agencies to whom the head of that agency has delegated authority to make or grant requests under this section, but only one officer in the agency shall have this delegated authority at any time.

“Law enforcement agency” or “agency” means a municipal police department, a county police department, or a sheriff’s office of this State. Subject to

G.S. 15A-403

, it also includes a municipal police department, a county police department, or a sheriff’s office of another state if the laws of the other state allow for the provision of mutual aid with out-of-state law enforcement officers. All other State and local agencies are exempted from the provisions of this section.

This section in no way reduces the jurisdiction or authority of State law enforcement officers.

For purposes of this section, the following shall be considered the equivalent of a municipal police department:

Campus law enforcement agencies established pursuant to G.S. 115D-21.1(a) or G.S. 116-40.5(a).

Colleges or universities which are licensed, or exempted from licensure, by

G.S. 116-15

and which employ company police officers commissioned by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74E or Chapter 74G of the General Statutes.

Law enforcement agencies operated or eligible to be operated by a municipality pursuant to

G.S. 63-53(2)

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 16B.4(d), effective July 1, 2013.

A Company Police agency of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services commissioned by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74E of the General Statutes.

History.

1967, c. 846; 1971, c. 698, s.1; c. 896, s.4; 1977, c. 534; 1981, c. 93, s. 2; 1987, c. 671, s. 4; 1989, c. 518, s. 2; 1991, c. 636, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1043, s. 6; 1997-143, s. 1; 1999-68, s. 4; 2005-231, s. 8; 2006-159, s. 4; 2009-94, s. 1; 2011-260, s. 4; 2013-360, s. 16B.4(d); 2018-87, s. 1; 2019-130, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to cooperation between law enforcement agencies, see

G.S. 113-28.2

A.

As to the employment of special police officers for the territory of the Butner Advisory Council Jurisdiction, see

G.S. 122C-408

.

As to authority of counties under this section, see

G.S. 153A-212

.

§ 160A-288.1.
Assistance by State law-enforcement officers; rules; cost.

The governing body of any city or county may request the Governor to assign temporarily State law-enforcement officers with statewide authority to provide law-enforcement protection when local law-enforcement officers: (i) are engaged in a strike; (ii) are engaged in a slowdown; (iii) otherwise refuse to fulfill their law-enforcement responsibilities; or (iv) submit mass resignations. The request from the governing body of the city or county shall be in writing. The request from a county governing board shall be upon the advice of the sheriff of the county.

The Governor shall formulate such rules, policies or guidelines as may be necessary to establish a plan under which temporary State law-enforcement assistance will be provided to cities and counties. The Governor may delegate the responsibility for developing appropriate rules, policies or guidelines to the head of any State department. The Governor may also delegate to a department head the authority to determine the number of officers to be assigned in a particular case, if any, and the length of time they are to be assigned.

While providing assistance to a city or county, a State law-enforcement officer shall be considered an employee of the State for all purposes, including compensation and fringe benefits.

While providing assistance to the city or county, a State officer shall be subject to the lawful operational commands of his State superior officers. The ranking representative of each State law-enforcement agency providing assistance shall consult with the appropriate city or county officials prior to deployment of the State officers under his command.

History.

1979, c. 639, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

A company operating a private prison

cannot be a party to a “mutual aid agreement” authorized by this section. See opinion of Attorney General to Senator Frank W. Ballance, Jr. and Representative E. David Redwine,
(3/28/2001).

§ 160A-288.2.
Assistance to State law-enforcement agencies.

Unless specifically prohibited or limited by an ordinance officially adopted by the governing body of the city or county by which the officer is employed, appointed, or elected to serve, the head of any local law-enforcement agency may temporarily provide assistance to a State law-enforcement agency in enforcing the laws of North Carolina if so requested in writing by the head of the State agency. The assistance may comprise allowing officers of the local agency to work temporarily with officers of the State agency (including in an undercover capacity) and lending equipment and supplies. While working with the State agency under the authority of this section, an officer shall have the same jurisdiction, powers, rights, privileges and immunities (including those relating to the defense of civil actions and the payment of judgments) as the officers of the State agency in addition to those the officer normally possesses. While on duty with the State agency, the officer shall be subject to the lawful operational commands of the officer’s superior officers in the State agency, but the officer shall for personnel and administrative purposes, remain under the control of the local agency, including for purposes of pay. The officer shall furthermore be entitled to workers’ compensation and the same benefits when acting pursuant to this section to the same extent as though the officer were functioning within the normal scope of the officer’s duties.

As used in this section:

“Head” means any director or chief officer of any State or local law-enforcement agency including the chief of police of a local department, chief of police of a county police department, and the sheriff of a county, or an officer of the agency to whom the head of that agency has delegated authority to make or grant requests under this section, but only one officer in the agency shall have this delegated authority at any time.

“Local law-enforcement agency” means any municipal police department, a county police department, or a sheriff’s office.

“State law-enforcement agency” means any State agency, force, department, or unit responsible for enforcing criminal laws.

This section in no way reduces the jurisdiction or authority of State law-enforcement officers.

For the purposes of this section, the following shall be considered the equivalent of a municipal police department:

Campus law-enforcement agencies established pursuant to G.S. 116-40.5(a).

Colleges or universities which are licensed, or exempted from licensure, by

G.S. 116-15

and which employ company police officers commissioned by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74E or Chapter 74G of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 16B.4(e), effective July 1, 2013.

History.

1981, c. 878; 1989, c. 518, s. 3; 1991, c. 636, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1043, s. 7; 2005-231, s. 9; 2006-159, s. 5; 2011-260, s. 5; 2011-326, s. 10; 2013-360, s. 16B.4(e); 2018-87, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to the employment of special police officers for the territory of the Butner Advisory Council Jurisdiction, see

G.S. 122C-408

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws, 2005-231, s. 9, effective July 28, 2005, added “or Chapter 74G of the General Statutes” at the end of subdivision (d)(2).

Session Laws 2006-159, s. 5, effective July 23, 2006, added “G.S. 116-40.5(a)” at the end of subdivision (d)(1); and added subdivision (d)(3).

Session Laws 2011-260, s. 5, effective June 23, 2011, substituted “Safety Authority” for “Safety” in subdivision (d)(3).

Session Laws 2011-326, s. 10, effective June 27, 2011, deleted “G.S. 116-40.5(a) and” preceding “G.S. 116-40.5(a)” in subdivision (d)(1).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 16B.4(e), effective July 1, 2013, deleted subdivision (d)(3).

Session Laws 2018-87, s. 2, effective June 25, 2018, rewrote the first sentence of subsection (a), made gender-neutral changes in the third through fifth sentences of subsection (a), and substituted “sheriff’s office” for “sheriff’s department” in subdivision (b)(2).

§ 160A-288.3.

Expired.

§ 160A-288.4.
Police chief may establish volunteer school safety resource officer program.

The chief of police of a local police department or of a county police department may establish a volunteer school safety resource officer program to provide nonsalaried special law enforcement officers to serve as school safety resource officers in public schools. To be a volunteer in the program, a person must have prior experience as either (i) a sworn law enforcement officer or (ii) a military police officer with a minimum of two years’ service. If a person with experience as a military police officer is no longer in the armed services, the person must also have an honorable discharge. A program volunteer must receive training on research into the social and cognitive development of elementary, middle, and high school children and must also meet the selection standards and any additional criteria established by the chief of police.

Each volunteer shall report to the chief of police and shall work under the direction and supervision of the chief of police or the chief’s designee when carrying out the volunteer’s duties as a school safety resource officer. No volunteer may be assigned to a school as a school safety resource officer until the volunteer has updated or renewed the volunteer’s law enforcement training and has been certified by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission as meeting the educational and firearms proficiency standards required of persons serving as criminal justice officers. A volunteer is not required to meet the physical standards required by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission but must have a standard medical exam to ensure the volunteer is in good health. A person selected by the chief of police to serve as a volunteer under this section shall have the power of arrest while performing official duties as a volunteer school safety resource officer.

The chief of police may enter into an agreement with the local board of education to provide volunteer school safety resource officers who meet both the criteria established by this section and the selection and training requirements set by the chief of police of the municipality or county in which the schools are located. The chief of police shall be responsible for the assignment of any volunteer school safety resource officer assigned to a public school and for the supervision of the officer.

There shall be no liability on the part of and no cause of action shall arise against a volunteer school safety resource officer, the chief of police or employees of the local law enforcement agency supervising a volunteer school safety officer, or the public school system or its employees for any good-faith action taken by them in the performance of their duties with regard to the volunteer school safety resource officer program established pursuant to this section.

History.

2013-360, s. 8.45(f).

§ 160A-289.
Training and development programs for law enforcement.

A city shall have authority to plan and execute training and development programs for law-enforcement agencies, and for that purpose may

Contract with other cities, counties, and the State and federal governments and their agencies;

Accept, receive, and disburse funds, grants and services;

Create joint agencies to act for and on behalf of participating counties and cities;

Make applications for, receive, administer, and expend federal grant funds; and

Appropriate and expend available tax or nontax funds.

History.

1969, c. 1145, s. 3; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; c. 896, s. 4.

§ 160A-289.1.
Resources to protect the public.

Subject to the requirements of

G.S. 7A-41

, 7A-44.1, 7A-64, 7A-102, 7A-133, and 7A-498.7, a city may appropriate funds under contract with the State for the provision of services for the speedy disposition of cases involving drug offenses, domestic violence, or other offenses involving threats to public safety. Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to make any appropriation to implement the provisions of this section. Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the Administrative Office of the Courts or the Office of Indigent Defense Services to maintain positions or services initially provided for under this section.

History.

1999-237, s. 17.17(c); 2000-67, s. 15.4(f); 2001-424, s. 22.11(f).

§ 160A-289.2.
Neighborhood crime watch programs.

A city may establish neighborhood crime watch programs within the city to encourage residents and business owners to promote citizen involvement in securing homes, businesses, and personal property against criminal activity and to report suspicious activities to law enforcement officials.

History.

2006-181, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to harassment of participants in neighborhood crime watch programs, see

G.S. 14-226.2

.

As to the establishment of neighborhood crime watch programs, see

G.S. 153A-212.2

.

§ 160A-290.

Reserved for future codification purposes.